North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-24.8 Garrison Diversion Conservancy District Irrigation Special Assessments
61-24.8-31.
District treasurer to insert amount of improvements in county real estate book or other forms — Regulations governing.

The district treasurer shall notify the county auditor not later than August twentieth in each year of any special assessments that were made in the improvement district in addition to those reported in the previous year. The county auditor shall make and deliver to the district treasurer on or before September twentieth each year a copy of the real estate assessment book or other forms for the current year covering all additions in which any special assessments have existed and where any will appear for the current year as advised by the district treasurer. The district treasurer shall insert in the proper columns under the appropriate headings the amount of each of the installments of the assessments on the lots or subdivisions of lots or tracts of land which are to be extended upon the tax lists of the improvement district for the current year. The district treasurer shall show the total amount of special assessments certified to the county auditor for the current year. If a division of property has been made since the original assessment, the district treasurer shall make or cause to be made the proper division of the special assessments on the lots or tracts of land in the same manner as general taxes are divided and assessed as furnished by the county auditor. The district treasurer shall certify the special assessments to the county auditor by November first of each year.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-32.
Extension of special assessments on tax lists — Collection — Payment over to district.

The county auditor shall extend the special assessments upon the improvement tax lists of the district for the current year and the assessments with interest and penalties must be collected as general taxes are collected and paid over to the district treasurer and shall be placed by the district treasurer in the respective funds for which they were collected.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-33.
Special assessment record book kept by county auditor — Assessments certified for more than one year.

The county auditor shall keep a special assessment record. When the improvement district causes the installments of special assessments for a period of more than one year to be certified, the county auditor shall cause the certified special assessments to be recorded for the respective years and in the amounts shown in the certificate of the district treasurer. The certificate of the district treasurer must include a list of all lots and tracts of land upon which such assessments are levied, designating the purpose of the assessment, the fund to which it belongs, and the installment of such assessment for each year against each lot or tract, including interest.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-34.
County treasurer to certify and receipt for amount of special assessments collected — Contents of certificate — Procedure for abatement.

Special assessments of any kind certified to the county auditor by the district treasurer must be paid to the county treasurer and included in the receipt required by section 57-20-08. If the county treasurer receives less than the full amount of taxes and special assessments due at any time on any lot or tract of real estate, the county treasurer shall allocate the amount of such payment between taxes and special assessments in proportion to the respective amounts of taxes and special assessments which are then due. When prorating any tax payment received before October fifteenth, the term “due”, as it pertains to real estate taxes, includes only the first installment of real estate taxes. Special assessments are not subject to abatement or refund by proceedings under chapter 57-32 but may be reviewed and corrected only in the manner and upon the conditions provided in chapter 40-26. The county treasurer, at the time set by law for the payment to the district treasurer of all the taxes and special assessments collected during the preceding month, shall certify the amounts of special assessments collected. The certificate must state specifically the lot or known subdivision as it appears on the tax books of the county treasurer; the block, addition, amount collected, and amount credited to each lot or known subdivision; and the year for which the sum was collected. The certificate must be furnished to the district treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-35.
Interest and penalties added to special assessments — County treasurer to collect and pay over.

The county treasurer shall add to all special assessments the same interest and penalties that are added in the case of general taxes and at the same time. The county treasurer shall collect the interest and penalties with the special assessments and shall pay all such interest and penalties collected over to the district treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-36.
Special improvement moneys to be kept separate — Designation and numbering of funds — Diversion of moneys prohibited.

All special assessments and taxes levied and other revenues pledged under the provisions of this chapter to pay the cost of an improvement constitute a fund for the payment of that cost, including all principal of and interest on bonds and other obligations issued by the district to finance the improvement, and may be diverted to no other purpose. The district treasurer shall hold all moneys received for any such fund as a special fund to be applied to payment for the improvement. Each fund must be designated by the name and number of the improvement district in or for which the special assessments, taxes, and revenues are collected. When all principal and interest on bonds and other obligations of the fund have been fully paid, all moneys remaining in a fund may be transferred into the general fund of the district. Any deficiency in any fund created for the payment of district bonds payable in whole or in part out of collections of special assessment taxes must be the general obligation of the district.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-37.
Bonds — When payable — Amounts — Interest.

At any time after entering a contract for a project to be financed in whole or in part by special assessments, the district may issue temporary and definitive bonds on the project fund created for that purpose in the manner and subject to the limitations prescribed in section 40-24-19. If the bonds are issued to finance an irrigation project, the net revenues derived from the imposition of service charges to be imposed and collected with respect to the project as provided in section 61-24.8-22 may be pledged to payment of those bonds. Bonds issued under this section must be in amounts as in the judgment of the board will be necessary for the project. The bonds must bear interest at a rate or rates and be sold at a price resulting in an average net interest cost not exceeding twelve percent per annum if sold at private sale. There is no interest rate ceiling on bond issues sold at public sale or to the state or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. The bonds must state upon their face the purpose for which they are issued and the project fund from which they are payable and must be signed by the manual or facsimile signature of the chairman of the district board and countersigned by the manual or facsimile signature of the secretary of the district. The bonds must be payable in such amounts as the board determines, extending over a period of not more than thirty years.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-38.
Bonds may be used in making payments on contract — Bonds payable out of fund on which drawn — May be used to pay special assessments.

Improvement bonds may be sold for cash at not less than ninety-eight percent of par and accrued interest, and the proceeds, less accrued interest, must be credited to the construction account of the fund and must be used exclusively to pay those contracts and construction costs. Any balance remaining in any construction account after completion of any project must be transferred to the sinking fund account of the assessment fund. The treasurer of the district shall pay special assessment bonds as they mature and are presented for payment out of the fund on which they are drawn and shall cancel the bonds when paid.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-39.
Refunding special assessment bonds — Purposes for which such bonds may be issued — Payment of bonds.

Any district having outstanding special assessment bonds, payable in whole or in part out of collections from special assessments, which are past-due or which are redeemable, either at the option of the district or with the consent of the bondholders, may issue refunding special assessment bonds if there is not sufficient money in the project fund against which such bonds are drawn to pay the same. The issuance of refunding bonds must be authorized by resolution of the board. The resolution must describe the bonds to be refunded and their amount and maturity. Refunding bonds may be issued to extend the maturities of bonds payable in whole or in part by special assessments or to reduce the interest on the bonds. Refunding bonds must bear such date, be in such date, be in such denominations, and mature serially within such time, not exceeding thirty years from date of issuance, as the board determines. The treasurer of the district shall pay special assessment bonds as they mature and are presented for payment out of the fund against which they are drawn and shall cancel the bonds when paid.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-40.
Foreclosure of tax lien on property when general and special assessment taxes are delinquent.

Special assessments imposed under this chapter become due and delinquent and are subject to penalties for nonpayment at the same date and rates as first installments of real estate taxes at the same time and in the same manner as provided in title 57. If there is no delinquent general property tax against a tract or parcel of land and it is foreclosed for special assessments alone, the notice of foreclosure of tax lien must state that the foreclosure is for special assessments and a tax deed in such case must be issued in the usual course of procedure.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.

61-24.8-41.
Contracts for construction or maintenance of project.

If the cost of construction or maintenance of a project does not exceed the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02, the work may be done on a day work basis or a contract may be let without being advertised. If the costs of the construction or maintenance exceed the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02, the board must let a contract in accordance with chapter 48-01.2.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 496, § 2.